Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Part 5. Notice to Apparent Owner of Property Presumed Abandoned

38-13-501.
Notice to apparent owner by holder.

Subject to subsection (2) of this section, the holder of property presumed abandoned shall send to the apparent owner notice that complies with section 38-13-502 in a format acceptable to the administrator, by first-class United States mail, not more than one hundred eighty days nor less than sixty days before filing the report under section 38-13-401 if:

The holder has in its records an address for the apparent owner that the holder’s records do not disclose to be invalid and that is sufficient to direct the delivery of first-class United States mail to the apparent owner; and

The value of the property is twenty-five dollars or more.

If an apparent owner has consented to receive electronic-mail delivery from the holder, the holder may send the notice described in subsection (1) of this section by electronic mail and not by first-class United States mail; except that, if the holder has evidence that the electronic mail could not be delivered, then the holder shall send the notice in accordance with subsection (1) of this section.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 429, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-502.
Contents of notice by holder.

The notice under section 38-13-501 must contain a heading that reads substantially as follows: “Notice. The State of Colorado requires us to notify you that your property may be transferred to the custody of the state treasurer if you do not contact us before [insert date that is thirty days after the date of this notice].”.

The notice under section 38-13-501 must:

Identify the nature and, except for property that does not have a fixed value, the value of the property that is the subject of the notice;

State that the property will be turned over to the administrator;

State that after the property is turned over to the administrator an apparent owner that seeks return of the property must file a claim with the administrator;

State that property that is not legal tender of the United States may be sold by the administrator; and

Provide instructions that the apparent owner must follow to prevent the holder from reporting and paying or delivering the property to the administrator.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 429, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-503.
Notice by administrator.

The administrator shall give notice to an apparent owner that property that is presumed abandoned and appears to be owned by the apparent owner is held by the administrator under this article 13.

In providing notice under subsection (1) of this section, the administrator shall send the notice to the apparent owner’s electronic-mail address if the administrator has an electronic-mail address that the administrator does not know to be invalid.

In addition to the notice under subsection (2) of this section, the administrator shall maintain a website or database accessible by the public and electronically searchable that contains the names reported to the administrator of all apparent owners for whom property is being held by the administrator.

The website or database maintained under subsection (3) of this section must include instructions for filing with the administrator a claim to property and a printable claim form with instructions for its use.

In addition to giving notice under subsection (2) of this section and maintaining the website or database under subsection (3) of this section, the administrator may use first-class mail, electronic mail, other printed publication, telecommunication, the internet, other media, or public events to inform the public of the existence of unclaimed property held by the administrator.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 430, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

38-13-504.
Cooperation among state officers and agencies to locate apparent owner.

Unless prohibited by law of this state other than this article 13, on request of the administrator, each officer, agency, board, commission, division, and department of this state, any body politic and corporate created by this state for a public purpose, and each political subdivision of this state shall make its books and records available to the administrator and cooperate with the administrator to determine the current address of an apparent owner of property held by the administrator under this article 13.

History.

Source:
L. 2019:

Entire article R&RE,(SB 19-088), ch. 110, p. 430, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.